apertium-ita-por.por.dix
	 <pardef n="cond/uzir__vblex">
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziríamos</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziria</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziríeis</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirias</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziriam</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziria</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziremos</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirei</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzireis</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirás</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirão</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirá</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirmos</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirmo</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantá"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirmos</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantemos"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzir</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzir</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantemos"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzí</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantá"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirdes</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirde</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantá"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirdes</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantemos"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzires</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzire</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantá"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzires</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantemos"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirem</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirem</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantam"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzir</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzir</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantar"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzí</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantá"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzindo</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzindo</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__canta"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzimos</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzimo</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantá"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzimos</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantemos"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzi</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzi</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantaste"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzistes</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziste</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantá"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzistes</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantemos"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziste</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziste</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantaste"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziram</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziram</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantam"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziu</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uziu</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__canta"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>amos</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzamo</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantá"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzamos</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantemos"/>
		 </e>
      
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzam</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzam</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantaste"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uze</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uze</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantaste"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzam</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzam</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantam"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uza</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uza</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzir</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzir</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantar"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzí</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantá"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirmos</l>
				 <r>uzir<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uzirmo</l>

<e lm="induzir">
	<i>ind</i>
	<par n="cond/uzir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="deduzir">
	<i>ded</i>
	<par n="cond/uzir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="luzir">
	<i>l</i>
	<par n="cond/uzir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="seduzir">
	<i>sed</i>
	<par n="cond/uzir__vblex"/>
</e>
